Tennessee, session 114, SB1480.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF TENNESSEE:
SECTION 1. Tennessee Code Annotated, Section 38-7-109(b), is amended by deleting
the subsection and substituting instead:
(b) When an autopsy is ordered by the district attorney general, the county
medical examiner shall notify the chief medical examiner, and the county medical
examiner may perform the autopsy or shall designate and authorize a pathologist to
perform the autopsy as provided in § 38-7-105. The costs and expense of the autopsy
must be paid by this state as other costs, chargeable to the state, are paid.
SECTION 2. This act takes effect July 1, 2026, the public welfare requiring it.
SB1480
010408
- 1 -